Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7376.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-132. Special plate for Partnership to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available
special motor vehicle registration plates for the not-for-profit entity Partnership to Reduce Cancer
in Rhode Island, a qualified 501(c)(3) tax-exempt organization. The plates shall be designed to
reference the Partnership to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island and Maryellen Goodwin to specifically
increase awareness of colon cancer. The plate shall be referred to as the Partnership to Reduce
Cancer in Rhode Island -- Maryellen Goodwin motor vehicle plate.
(b) The special plate shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the
vehicle for which it was issued and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the
registration plates issued to the vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be
removed from the vehicle and returned to the division of motor vehicles. The registration certificate
for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle in accordance with § 31-3-9. The registration certificate
shall be in effect for the special plate.
(c) The Partnership to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island -- Maryellen Goodwin motor vehicle
plates shall be the same size as regular motor vehicle plates and shall be designed by the Partnership
to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island in conjunction with the division of motor vehicles, with the
design approved by the Rhode Island state police.

(d) The Partnership to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island -- Maryellen Goodwin plates shall
be subject to compliance with § 31-3-117 relating to the number of minimum prepaid orders of
plates per plate type (i.e., passenger, commercial, etc.) and any required payment. The Partnership
to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island -- Maryellen Goodwin plates shall not be issued unless the
minimum order requirements are met. The initial order will be handled by the Partnership to Reduce
Cancer in Rhode Island and shall not be submitted to the division of motor vehicles for production
until the minimum order(s) have been met and the proper paper work submitted to the division.
(e) The administrator of motor vehicles shall develop prepayment procedures and any other
procedures deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.
(f) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Partnership to
Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island plates shall be subject to a forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge.
(g) The forty-dollar ($40.00) issuance surcharge shall be allocated as follows: twenty
dollars ($20.00) shall be allocated to the general fund and the remaining twenty dollars ($20.00)
shall be distributed annually to the Partnership to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island to assist in the
fiscal needs and in furtherance of its mission to raise colon cancer awareness.
(h) A ten-dollar ($10.00) surcharge for subsequent registration renewals shall be allocated
to the Partnership to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island.
(i) In consideration of the receipt of funds from the registration of Partnership to Reduce
Cancer in Rhode Island -- Maryellen Goodwin motor vehicle license plates, Partnership to Reduce
Cancer in Rhode Island shall use any Rhode Island-sourced funds in and for the benefit of Rhode
Island-based charitable organizations to raise colon cancer awareness.
(j) Partnership to Reduce Cancer in Rhode Island will be required to submit an annual
accounting report to the administrator of the division before such monies are distributed.
(k) There shall be no refunds for early cancellation of the Partnership to Reduce Cancer in
Rhode Island -- Maryellen Goodwin plates.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004491/SUB A
========
LC004491/SUB A - Page 2 of 3